Utah statutes.
73-26-201.   Entities eligible to receive developed water -- Leasing developed water -- Use of developed water.

(1)  Water developed by projects authorized under this chapter, except water reserved for wildlife or public recreation, shall be made available by contract exclusively to the following entities:

(a)  the Bear River Water Conservancy District;

(b)  the Salt Lake County Water Conservancy District;

(c)  the Weber Basin Water Conservancy District; and

(d)  Cache County and any water conservancy district in Cache County.

(2)  A county or conservancy district that purchases or leases developed water may lease the water to any person.

(3)  A county or conservancy district that purchases or leases developed water may use the water directly or by exchange in accordance with Section 73-3-20.

